District of Columbia statutes.
7-303

Medical examination or treatment not required.

Nothing in this chapter or any rules or regulations issued pursuant to this chapter shall be construed to compel a person with cancer to submit to medical examination or treatment.

July 27, 1951, 65 Stat. 124, ch. 241, § 3
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-83, § 2(c), 32 DCR 7276
1981 Ed., § 6-1203.
1973 Ed., § 6-1303.